src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.aff
FLAG num
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 n rrie's n
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 e or's e
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 a ce a
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 n tt's n
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 a en's a
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 r tt's r
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 i lia i
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 a dra's a
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 a ene a
SFX 786 Y 1
SFX 786 n rdon's n
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 e rie e
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 i rie i
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 e ll's e
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 n ssie n
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 e he e
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 d lcock's d
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 i ll's i
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 a ell a
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 a dra a
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 a lene a
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 e lene e
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 a in's a
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 n tton's n
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 i lene i
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 e in's e
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 a ie a
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 a ee a
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 e ie e
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 a ella's a
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 i sey's i
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 n rry's n
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 o rry's o
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 e ngton e
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 a ina a
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 e ney's e
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 a ne a
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 a dy's a
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 e ina e
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 a lie's a
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 e ne e
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 e igh's e
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 a dell a
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 n rri's n
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 e lie's e
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 i juana i
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 i lie's i
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 a yn's a
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 e rina's e
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 a ika a
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 i rine i
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 i yn's i
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 a man a
SFX 887 Y 1
SFX 887 e ke e
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 e se e
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 n yn's n
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 e ko's e
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 e man e
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 i ke i
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 a een a
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 n se n
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 a el a
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 a ita a
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 a le a
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 e ita e
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 n ster n
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 e le e
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 i le i
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 l ndy l
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 m ndy m
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 m te m
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 a ha's a
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 a een's a
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 a es's a
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 e ha's e
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 s ty's s
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 r tha's r
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 n rna's n
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 a ta's a
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 e ney e
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 a ris a
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 e ta's e
SFX 899 Y 1
SFX 899 a isha a
SFX 842 Y 1
SFX 842 i ly's i
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 a ell's a
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 a nda a
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 a ds a
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 e isha e
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 l ta's l
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 e ington e
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 e nda e
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 n ris n
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 e igh e
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 s ta's s
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 a ler's a
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 a ira a
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 e ington's e
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 i li's i
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 e itt e
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 a la's a
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 a is's a
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 a ford a
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 e la's e
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 n yne's n
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 e ford e
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 e is's e
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 i la's i
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 a ger's a
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 a ice's a
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 t yne's t
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 a is a
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 n re n
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 a es a
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 e is e
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 i leen's i
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 a ne's a
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 a us's a
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 a essa a
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 e ne's e
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 i sey i
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 e ll e
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 a ette a
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 i ll i
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 e isa e
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 a da's a
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 i tie i
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 n rdon n
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 a ene's a
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 e ker e
SFX 895 Y 1
SFX 895 a issa a
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 e ng e
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 a iko a
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 a ise's a
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 d ks d
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 e ss e
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 n re's n
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 i leen i
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 n ss n
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 e per e
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 e per's e
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 a in a
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 a en a
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 e in e
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 a us a
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 n tte n
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 s tte s
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 a sha a
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 e gan e
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 l ndy's l
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 a ice a
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 m ndy's m
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 n sman's n
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 m sha m
SFX 398 Y 1
SFX 398 n sha n
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 a lie a
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 i juana's i
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 a ela's a
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 e lie e
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 r sha r
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 n ttie n
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 n sette n
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 i lie i
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 a die a
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 a on a
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 e on e
SFX 892 Y 1
SFX 892 e itt's e
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 h on h
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 i on i
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 l on l
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 a cia a
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 a isha's a
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 a sha's a
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 e isha's e
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 m sha's m
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 n sha's n
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 r sha's r
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 n rri n
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 e ham e
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 a ds's a
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 a lene's a
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 a yn a
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 e lene's e
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 n ston's n
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 n rtha's n
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 n ster's n
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 n yne n
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 e ther e
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 i lene's i
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 a sa's a
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 e ng's e
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 a ie's a
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 i yn i
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 i tie's i
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 a ine a
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 t yne t
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 e sa's e
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 e ie's e
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 n yn n
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 e ine e
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 e ker's e
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 m nisha m
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 a man's a
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 e man's e
SFX 876 Y 1
SFX 876 i ki's i
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 a ka's a
