src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.dic
Adria/96,164,165
Agar/1,725
Alda/1,96,162
Aleta/1,263
Allen/1,2,3,4,5,679,681
Alvera/1,114
Alysa/1,44,140,172,263
Angie/1,358
Anisa/1,140,263
Ariane/1,100
Arla/1,56,138,160,374
Arlen/1,2,3,4,5,704,706
Ashlee/912
Audra/1,44,56,120,313
Bate/1,6,7,20,21,116,117,176,177
Bavin/1,733
Berna/1,56,158,303,374,593
Bette/1,94,191,609
Boos/1,485
Bowe/1,6,7,8,9,36,37,176,177,884,885
Brenda/8,9,172,173
Burke/1,892
Cade/1,60,176
Cain/1,235,281
Cara/1,96,120,243,643
Carri/414,415,820,821
Case/1,12,94
Cathern/1,675
Cathi/1,2,3,443,444,533,534
Chanda/860
Chara/189,585,589
Charla/138,193,307,322,464,984
Chet/1,986
Christa/138
Clara/1,120,160,303,374
Cleta/1,697
Collen/1,704,706
Cora/1,18,118,120,138,164,211,374,475,638,643
Cori/1,2,3,8,10,11,16,17,131,132,144,145,410,411,533,534
Cornelia/1,697
Dalia/189
Daria/1,697
Darla/1,120,138,160,164,193,613
Dave/1,12,364,892
Dede/1,176,284
Delora/1,6,7,253,254,464,465
Demetra/1,44,303
Demetria/697
Dollie/1,239
Dora/1,138,164,374,772
Dori/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,16,17,88,89,174,175,301,302,517,518
Dove/1,12,94
Dulce/1,94
Dyer/1,487
Edda/1,56,96
Edra/1,253
Elda/1,96,162,172,544
Elia/964,965
Elke/1,452,609
Elsa/1,56,120
Elva/1,44,56,253
Emelia/1,90,243
Emma/1,56,296
Erna/1,56
Esta/1,162,942
Etha/1,8,9,376,377
Etta/1,56
Eugena/1,44,56
Evia/1,114
Fannie/1,239
Felisa/1,263
Fran/1,154,501,679
Freeda/1,432
Gena/1,44,56,90
Geneva/56
Genna/56
Geri/1,408,521,719,838
Gina/1,307,920
Goode/1,176
Gore/1,176
Grace/1,76,94
Gracia/942
Greta/1,114
Hardie/1,239
Herta/1,263
Ingle/364
Jacque/1,6,7,72,73,94,95,295,296,297
Jaime/1,2,3,94,95
Jame/1,2,3,6,7,12,13,18,19,94,95
Jana/928,929
Jeri/1,80,197,353,517,521,838
Jetta/1,56
Jolie/1,100
June/1,94,251,603
Junie/798
Kali/1,350,676
Kane/1,181,605
Karma/96
Kathern/1,675
Kaylee/8,9,912,913
Keen/1,2,3,4,5,88,89,396,398
Keli/1,517,689
Kera/1,96
Keva/1,96,255
Kina/1,633
Kinsela/1,189
Kristi/1,2,3,8,10,11,16,17,88,89,594,598,676,678
Krysta/1,18,96,442
Kyle/1,2,3,94,95
Latia/1,90,330,964
Lauri/1,174,175,676,678
Leda/1,315,920
Leia/1,78,140,189,330
Lesa/1,44,146,263,591
Leta/1,263,898
Love/1,94,187,858,878
Luke/1,36,364,452
Lura/1,585,864
Malisa/140
Mara/1,96,114,174,643
Marica/942
Marquis/1,324
Marquita/114
Marti/676,678
Melisa/140
Mellisa/140
Merle/452
Mica/1,42,195,263
Micha/56,615
Miki/1,876
Mira/1,90,114,174,470,569
Mirta/263
Miss/1,12,485
Mitsue/1,603
Mole/1,247,853
Myer/1,749
Nada/1,44,160,164
Nakia/1,114,330
Nelia/1,78
Nila/1,78,140,346
Nilsa/96
Nora/1,42,138,160,164,322,615
Nova/1,470
Onie/1,325
Priscila/1,189
Pura/1,315,322
Reba/1,136
Renna/56
Reta/1,114,263
Reva/1,136
Rhoda/1,464
Rhona/1,78
Riva/1,888
Robbi/1,2,3,8,9,676,678
Sade/1,94
Sanda/311,464,627
Sani/1,890
Shakia/1,114,205
Shiela/1,948
Shirlee/1,8,9,100,101
Shizue/1,603
Simona/948
Sina/1,315
Steve/1,8,94,95,549,550
Swan/1,20,54,229,679
Taber/1,725
Talia/1,330
Tana/1,44,90,315,619,633,898
Tara/1,42,96,205,330
Tari/1,676
Tawana/1,78,90
Thea/1,78
Theresa/1,44,140
Tova/1,136
Tresa/1,140
Tressa/56
Twana/1,78,90
Tyra/1,136,311
Vanesa/1,140
Verge/1,94
Vida/1,18,860
Viki/1,876
Whitta/136,442
Yoshie/1,603
Yvone/1,100
Zana/1,633
